Nebraska, session 109, LB1176.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1176 LB1176
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 60-601, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
60-601 Sections 60-601 to 60-6,383 and sections 3 to 5 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Rules of the Road.
Sec. 2. Section 60-605, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
60-605 For purposes of the Nebraska Rules of the Road, the
definitions found in sections 60-606 to 60-676.01 and sections 3 and 4 of
this act shall be used.
Sec. 3. Highway work zone means a maintenance, repair, or
construction zone described in section 60-6,188.
Sec. 4. Speed control enforcement system means any photographic
device, radar device, laser device, or other electrical or mechanical
device that is designed to:
(1) Detect and record the speed of a vehicle; and
(2) Obtain a clear photograph or other recorded image of the rear
license plate of a vehicle when the speed of such vehicle exceeds the
maximum lawful speed limit.
Sec. 5. (1) If there is any worker present in a highway work zone,
the maximum lawful speed limit for such highway work zone may be enforced
by means of a speed control enforcement system if:
(a) Signage is displayed at the entry to such highway work zone and
such signage provides notice that a speed control enforcement system is
or may be in use; and
(b) A law enforcement officer is present in or near the highway work
zone in a vehicle that clearly displays official identification that
indicates that the vehicle is used for law enforcement purposes. Such
identification may include emergency lights or the logo, name, or
insignia of a law enforcement agency on the exterior of the vehicle.
(2) A speed control enforcement system operating in a highway work
zone shall not record the speed of a vehicle or an image of a vehicle or
-2-

LB1176 LB1176
2026 2026
its license plate unless the speed of the vehicle detected by the speed
control enforcement system exceeds eleven miles per hour over the maximum
lawful speed limit.
Sec. 6. Section 60-3202, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
60-3202 For purposes of the Automatic License Plate Reader Privacy
Act:
(1) Alert means data held by the Department of Motor Vehicles, each
criminal justice information system maintained in this state, the Federal
Bureau of Investigation National Crime Information Center, the Federal
Bureau of Investigation Kidnappings and Missing Persons list, the Missing
Persons Information Clearinghouse established under section 29-214.01,
and license plate numbers that have been manually entered into the
automatic license plate reader system upon a law enforcement officer's
determination that the vehicles or individuals associated with the
license plate numbers are relevant and material to an ongoing criminal or
missing persons investigation;
(2)(a) (2) Automatic license plate reader system means one or more
mobile or fixed automated high-speed cameras used in combination with
computer algorithms to convert images of license plates into computer-
readable data. ;
(b) Automatic license plate reader system does not include a speed
control enforcement system as defined in section 4 of this act that is
operated under the Nebraska Rules of the Road;
(3) Captured plate data means global positioning system coordinates,
date and time information, photographs, license plate numbers, and any
other data captured by or derived from any automatic license plate reader
system;
(4) Governmental entity means a department or agency of this state,
the federal government, another state, or a political subdivision or an
individual acting for or as an agent of any of such entities; and
-3-

LB1176 LB1176
2026 2026
(5) Secured area means a place, enclosed by clear boundaries, to
which access is limited and not open to the public and into which entry
is only obtainable through specific access-control points.
Sec. 7. Original section 60-3202, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 60-601 and 60-605, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, are repealed.
-4-